Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. From the funds appropriated to the Oklahoma Health
Care Authority in Enrolled House Bill No. 2766 of the 1st Session of
the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the sum of One Hundred Million
Thirty-one Thousand Six Hundred Seventy-seven Dollars
($100,031,677.00) shall be used for program growth and to replace
funding no longer available due to the reduction of federal matching
dollars.
SECTION 2. A. The duties and compensation of employees, not
otherwise prescribed by law, necessary to perform the duties imposed
upon the Oklahoma Health Care Authority by law shall be set by the
Administrator of the Oklahoma Health Care Authority.

B. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority is authorized to:
1. Pay professional expenses of the Administrator of the
Authority including dues, licenses, professional memberships, and
continuing education classes conducted in this state; and
2. Pay professional expenses of any employee including dues,
licenses, professional memberships, continuing medical education
classes conducted in this state, and medical malpractice insurance
provided he or she is a full-time employee of the Authority in
accordance with subsection B of Section 5006 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes and is utilizing those professional skills in the
performance of his or her job duties.
SECTION 3. In order to facilitate cash management of federal
grant receipts and disbursements, the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services shall transfer monies between the Oklahoma
Health Care Authority federal and revolving funds in amounts
requested by the Oklahoma Health Care Authority.
SECTION 4. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority is authorized to
transfer funds from Fund 205 and Fund 270 to Fund 200 and Fund 340
to satisfy claims made to the Authority under the Supplemental
Hospital Offset Payment Program Act.
SECTION 5. The Administrator of the Oklahoma Health Care
Authority may request that receipt and expenditure of unanticipated
federal funds awarded after July 1, 2025, be exempt from expenditure
limitations and from budgetary limitations.
SECTION 6. A. The Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services shall transfer monies appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund and the Health Care Enhancement Fund to the
Oklahoma Health Care Authority disbursing funds in the amounts and
ratios requested by the Authority, except that the cumulative
amounts transferred shall not exceed the cumulative amounts of equal
monthly allotments of the appropriations from the General Revenue
Fund and the Health Care Enhancement Fund.
B. Monies appropriated or collected for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, may be transferred to these disbursing funds for the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1136 Page 2

fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, to satisfy encumbrances and
obligations of such fiscal year; provided, that monies equal in
amount are transferred from appropriations or collections for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, to the disbursing fund for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, to satisfy encumbrances and
obligations of such fiscal year. All transfer requests shall be in
writing to the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise
Services.
C. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall maintain records of
the inter-year transfers.
SECTION 7. The Administrator of the Oklahoma Health Care
Authority may request, through the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services, the early transfer by the
Oklahoma Tax Commission of tax collections to the General Revenue
Fund for the purpose of early allocation to the agency’s disbursing
funds to alleviate cash-flow problems.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1136 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1136 Page 4